Utah statutes.
63M-1-2605.   Initial proposal -- Requirements.
(1)  In accordance with this part, a private entity may at any time submit to
the committee an initial proposal for a project.
(2)  An initial proposal shall include:
(a)  a conceptual description of the project;
(b)  a description of the economic benefit of the project to the state and the
affected department;
(c)  information concerning the products, services, and supplies currently
being provided by the state, that are similar to the project;
(d)  an estimate of the following costs associated with the project:
(i)  design;
(ii)  implementation;
(iii)  operation and maintenance; and
(iv)  any other related project cost; and
(e)  the name and address of a person who may be contacted for further
information concerning the initial proposal.
(3)  A private entity submitting an initial proposal under this section shall
pay the fee required by Section 63M-1-2612 when the initial proposal is
submitted.
(4)  An initial proposal submitted under this section is a protected record
under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act,
until the chief procurement officer initiates a procurement process in
accordance with Section 63G-6-408.5.
(5)  The board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, detailing the portions of an initial proposal
that remain protected after the chief procurement officer initiates a
procurement process.
